Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1904
Board; meetings; examination for license; rules.

The plumbing board shall fix stated times and places of meeting, which times shall not be less than once in every two weeks and meetings may be held more often upon written call of the chairman of the board. The board shall adopt rules for the examination, at such times and places, of all persons who desire a license to work at the construction or repairing of plumbing within the city or village, and also within the area of the zoning jurisdiction outside the corporate limits of cities of the metropolitan class.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 4, p. 323;

R.S.1913, § 5277;

C.S.1922, § 4500;

C.S.1929, § 19-304;

R.S.1943, § 19-304;

Laws 1961, c. 57, § 4, p. 212;

Laws 1965, c. 76, § 1, p. 310.